Alaska statutes. Title 6. Banks and Financial Institutions.
Article 5. Conduct of Corporate Affairs.

Sec. 06.05.430.
Meetings of stockholders. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.435.
Directors.

The affairs of every bank incorporated under this chapter shall be managed by not less than five directors, nor more than 25. A majority of the board of directors shall be bona fide residents of the state, and a majority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Unless otherwise approved by the department, each director of a state bank shall own, in the director’s own right or jointly with the director’s spouse, free of any encumbrance, common or preferred stock of the state bank or of an entity that controls the state bank that has an aggregate par value of at least $1,000, an aggregate shareholder’s equity of at least $1,000, or an aggregate fair market value of at least $1,000.

Each director shall take an oath that the director will faithfully and honestly perform the duties of the office and will not violate or permit to be violated any provisions of this chapter. The oath shall be filed annually in the office of the department.

[Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

A bank shall report within 30 days to the department a change in directors, including a statement of the business and professional affiliations of new directors.

The department may issue an order under AS

06.01.030

removing a person from the board of directors or prohibiting a person from being on the board, if the department determines that

due to the competence, experience, character, or integrity of the person, it is not in the best interests of the depositors or the public for the person to be or remain on the board;

the person is dishonest or reckless in managing the affairs of the bank;

the person has persistently violated this title, the regulations adopted under this title, or the orders of the department under this title or under the regulations adopted under this title;

the person has been indicted for a felony or other crime involving moral turpitude or breach of trust; or

the person has filed a petition in bankruptcy either in an individual capacity or in the name of a corporation in which the person owns a majority of the shares.

In the case of an entity that owns more than one bank, a director may use the director’s equity interest in the controlling entity to satisfy, in whole or in part, the equity interest requirement for one or all of the controlled banks.

The value of the common or preferred stock held by a director of a state bank or of an entity that controls the state bank is valued as of the date purchased, or as of the date on which the individual became a director, whichever value is greater.

History.

(§ 3.223 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 14 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 66 — 68, 102 ch 26 SLA 1993; am §§ 26, 27 ch 75 SLA 2002)

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks §§ 350-352.

Sec. 06.05.437.
Officers.

The officers of a bank shall be chosen by the board of directors. An officer may not be appointed to serve for a period longer than one year. If a president of a bank or other chief officer responsible for the management of the bank is not a director, the officer must be an ex officio member of the board of directors without the power to vote.

A bank shall report within 30 days to the department any changes among executive officers, including in its report a statement of the business and professional affiliations of new executive officers.

If the department determines that an officer or employee of the bank has been negligent, dishonest, reckless, or incompetent in the performance of official duties, the department may order the board to remove the officer or employee from office, after giving the board and the officer or employee an opportunity for a hearing under AS

06.01.030

. If the board neglects or refuses to remove the officer or employee from office and if losses due to the negligence, dishonesty, recklessness, or incompetence of the officer or employee accrue to the bank after the neglect or refusal, the order of the department is conclusive evidence of the negligence of the board under this subsection in an action brought against the board, or a member of the board, for recovery of the losses.

History.

(§ 15 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 30 ch 169 SLA 1978; am §§ 69, 70 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

Validity, construction, and effect of “regulatory exclusion” in directors’ and officers’ liability insurance policy. 21 ALR5th 292.

Sec. 06.05.438.
Directors, meetings, and duties.

The board of directors of each bank shall hold a meeting at least once each month for at least 10 months in each calendar year.

The board of directors shall elect a secretary who shall keep a correct record of the minutes of each board meeting. The minutes shall state the date of each meeting, the names of the directors present, and the votes taken. The record of the meeting of the board of directors shall be subscribed to by the presiding officer and the secretary. The minutes shall be read and approved at the next succeeding meeting, and the minutes of that meeting shall show that fact. It is the duty of the bank examiner to examine the minutes of the board at the time of the bank’s examination and to include in the report of examination any failure of the bank to comply with this section.

The board of directors shall designate at least one officer of the bank to prepare and submit to the board at each board meeting a report of the loans, overdrafts, and investments made by the bank in the preceding month or since the last report. The board of directors shall examine and pass upon the report and make it a part of the record of the meeting by recording the report in full in the minutes.

The board of directors shall appoint annually an examining committee of no less than three directors of which no more than one may be an active officer of the bank. The committee shall examine or cause to be examined the condition of the bank. A copy of the report shall be submitted to the department within 60 days after completion of the examination.

Unless prohibited by the articles or bylaws of the state bank, the board of directors or a committee of the board may validly conduct a meeting by communicating simultaneously with each other by means of conference telephones or similar communications equipment.

The department may require a meeting of the board of directors of a state bank to be held in the manner and at the time and place the department directs when, in the judgment of the department, a violation of this title has occurred or is about to occur. A report of an examination required or allowed by this title, the conclusions drawn from the examination by the department, recommendations made by the department, and other matters concerning the operation and condition of the bank may be presented to the board of directors by the department. If the department presents a report of examination or other information is presented to the board, each member of the board of directors shall furnish to the department a statement, on forms to be supplied by the department, that the member has read and is familiar with the recommendations of the department.

History.

(§ 16 ch 230 SLA 1968; am §§ 71, 72 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For powers of the department of commerce, see 3 AAC 2, art. 1.

For banking practices, see 3 AAC 2, art. 2.

Sec. 06.05.440.
Authority to declare dividends.

The directors of a bank transacting business in the state may declare a dividend out of the net profits, subject to any restrictions under AS

06.05.307(c)

and after complying with AS

06.05.441

—

06.05.445

.

History.

(§ 3.224 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 17 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 73 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Collateral references. —

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking § 62.

Sec. 06.05.441.
Conditions precedent to dividend declaration and payment.

Before a bank dividend is declared or the net profits for the period covered by the dividend disposed of, and after the restoration of any undivided profits or surplus under AS

06.05.442

, not less than one-fifth of these net profits shall be carried to the bank surplus account until the surplus account equals 100 percent of the paid-in capital of the bank.

The department may require a bank to suspend the payment of any dividends until all orders or requirements of this section and AS

06.05.442

have been complied with.

History.

(§ 18 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 31 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 74 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.442.
Excess losses; restoration of surplus; payment of dividends.

A loss sustained by a bank in excess of its undivided profits and any capital contingency reserves shall be charged to its surplus account or, with the approval of the department, carried as negative undivided profits. The bank’s undivided profits and surplus account shall thereafter be reimbursed from earnings, and no dividends may be declared or paid by the bank until any negative undivided profits are eliminated and the surplus account is restored to at least the amount from which the surplus was originally reduced.

History.

(§ 19 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 75 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.443.
Limitation on dividends. [Repealed, § 102 ch 26 SLA 1993.]

Sec. 06.05.445.
Net undivided profits and dividends.

A bank may not declare or pay a dividend in an amount greater than its net undivided profits then on hand.

In determining net profits for the purpose of declaring a dividend, a bank may not include in its calculations

loan loss reserves and losses in excess of reserves, including loans or other credits upon which interest for a period of six months is due and unpaid, unless the loan or credit is well secured and in the process of collection;

interest accrued but not collected on loans or other credits upon which the interest due is more than 90 days delinquent;

interest collected but not earned;

assets or depreciation that the department has required to be charged off;

the appreciation of any asset above its actual cost to the bank; and

any accrued expenses, interest or taxes due from the bank.

History.

(§ 3.224 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 21 ch 230 SLA 1968; am § 76 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.450.
Shareholders list.

Each bank shall keep a record of the name and residence of each shareholder of the bank, the class and number of shares held by each, the time when each person became a shareholder, and all transfers of stock, stating the time when made, the number of shares, and by whom transferred. A list of current shareholders shall be available for inspection in the bank office by any shareholder on demand.

History.

(§ 3.225 ch 129 SLA 1951; am § 33 ch 169 SLA 1978; am § 77 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Sec. 06.05.455.
Deposit insurance. [Repealed, § 54 ch 169 SLA 1978.]

Sec. 06.05.460.
Report upon inactive deposit accounts.
[Repealed, § 14 ch 133 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 06.05.462.
Conversions, mergers, and consolidations.

A national bank located in the state may convert to a state bank or merge or consolidate with a state bank, and a state bank may merge or consolidate with another state bank, if the merger or consolidation is consistent with federal and state law and approved by the department.

Before merger or consolidation under (a) of this section, banks shall file with the department an application and other information and reports that the department requires.

The department, in the exercise of its power to approve or disapprove applications for merger or consolidation, shall act in the interests of promoting and maintaining a sound banking system, the security of deposits and customers, the preservation of the liquid position of banks, and in the interest of preventing injurious credit expansions and contractions.

A state bank converting to or merging or consolidating with a national bank shall submit a copy of the application for national charter or application to convert, merge, or consolidate to the department at the time those documents are forwarded to the comptroller of the currency.

History.

(§ 3.228 ch 129 SLA 1951; added by § 2 ch 74 SLA 1962; am § 13 ch 157 SLA 1970; am §§ 78 — 80 ch 26 SLA 1993)

Administrative Code. —

For liquidation, dissolution, and reorganization, see 3 AAC 2, art. 4.

Collateral references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d, Banks, §§ 191-206, 222-224, 231, 234, 238.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 128, 156-162, 600-605.

Sec. 06.05.463.
[Renumbered as AS 06.05.120.]